District of Columbia statutes.
7-226

Regulations.

The Registrar may issue regulations as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The regulations shall be issued according to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

History

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 27, 28 DCR 3271

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-228.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-226.